Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF109.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Laws 2013, chapter 143, article 9, section 21, is amended to read: Sec. 21. CITY OF MAPLEWOOD; TAX INCREMENT FINANCING DISTRICT; SPECIAL RULES. (a) If the city of Maplewood elects, upon the adoption of a tax increment financing plan for a district, the rules under this section apply to one or more redevelopment tax increment financing districts established by the city or the economic development authority of the city. The area within which the redevelopment tax increment districts may be created is parcel 362922240002 (the "parcel") or any replatted parcels constituting a part of the parcel and the adjacent rights-of-way. For purposes of this section, the parcel is the "3M Renovation and Retention Project Area" or "project area." (b) The requirements for qualifying redevelopment tax increment districts under Minnesota Statutes, section 469.174, subdivision 10, do not apply to the parcel, which is deemed eligible for inclusion in a redevelopment tax increment district. (c) The 90 percent rule under Minnesota Statutes, section 469.176, subdivision 4j, does not apply to the parcel. (d) The expenditures outside district rule under Minnesota Statutes, section 469.1763, subdivision 2, does not apply; the five-year rule under Minnesota Statutes, section 469.1763, subdivision 3, is extended to ten years; and expenditures must only be made within the project areanew text begin or the area bounded by State Highway 61 to the West, Interstate Highway 694 to the North, McKnight Road to the East, and a line extending from Frost Avenue through to McKnight Road to the Southnew text end . (e) If, after one year from the date of certification of the original net tax capacity of the tax increment district, no demolition, rehabilitation, or renovation of property has been commenced on a parcel located within the tax increment district, no additional tax increment may be taken from that parcel, and the original net tax capacity of the parcel shall be excluded from the original net tax capacity of the tax increment district. If 3M Company subsequently commences demolition, rehabilitation, or renovation, the authority shall certify to the county auditor that the activity has commenced, and the county auditor shall certify the net tax capacity thereof as most recently certified by the commissioner of revenue and add it to the original net tax capacity of the tax increment district. The authority must submit to the county auditor evidence that the required activity has taken place for each parcel in the district. (f) The authority to approve a tax increment financing plan and to establish a tax increment financing district under this section expires December 31, 2018. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day after the city of Maplewood and its chief clerical officer comply with Minnesota Statutes, section 645.021, subdivisions 2 and 3. new text end